California statutes. Education Code
(3) Prohibit the surreptitious photographing or video-recording of pupils who are being investigated. For purposes of this paragraph, “surreptitious photographing or video-recording” means the covert collection of photographic or videographic images of persons or places subject to an investigation. For purposes of this paragraph, the collection of images is not covert if the
 technology is used in open and public view.

(4) Require that employees and contractors of the school district engaged in the investigation identify themselves truthfully as such to individuals contacted or interviewed during the course of the investigation.

(5) Require a school district to specify the basis for a determination of nonresidency of a pupil, and provide a process to appeal that determination. If an appeal is made, the burden shall be on the appealing party to show why the decision of the school district should be overruled.

(c) The policy required pursuant to this section shall be adopted at a public meeting of the governing board of the school district.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 86, Sec. 65.   (SB 1171)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

48204.3.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Active military duty” means full-time military duty status in the active uniformed service of the United States, including members of the California National Guard and the State Guard on active duty orders pursuant to Title 10 or 32 of the United States Code or Part 1 (commencing with Section 100) of Division 2 of the Military and Veterans Code.

(2) “Military installation” means a base, camp, post, station, yard, center, home port facility for any ship, or other activity under the jurisdiction of the United States Department of Defense or the United
 States Coast Guard.

(3) “Parent” means the natural or adoptive parent or guardian of a dependent child.

(b) (1) Notwithstanding Section 48200, a pupil complies with the residency requirements for school attendance in a school district, if the pupil is a pupil whose parent is transferred or is pending transfer to a military installation within the state while on active military duty pursuant to an official military order.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), “pupil” includes a pupil eligible for services or accommodations pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), or the
 federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), as applicable.

(c) A school district shall accept applications by electronic means for enrollment, including enrollment in a specific school or program within the school district, and course registration for pupils described in subdivision (b).

(d) (1) The parent shall provide proof of residence in the school district, including by using any of the documents described in subdivision (a) of Section 48204.1, within 10 days after the published arrival date provided on official documentation.

(2) For purposes of paragraph (1), a parent may use any of the following addresses as related to their military move:

(A) A temporary on-base billeting facility or off-base hotel.

(B) A purchased or leased home or apartment.

(C) Federal government or public-private venture on- or off-base military housing.

(D) Other temporary housing.

(e) Upon notification that a pupil enrolling pursuant to this section is receiving, or may be eligible to receive, services or
 accommodations pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), or the federal Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 12101 et seq.), as applicable, the school district shall promptly coordinate with the pupil’s parents and previous school pursuant to Section 56325 to ensure the timely exchange of records and to reduce any delays in the pupil receiving comparable services or accommodations from the school district, including, but not limited to, implementation of their individualized education program, individualized family service plan, or plan pursuant to Section 504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C. Sec. 794), as applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 608, Sec. 7.   (AB 2467)   Effective September 27, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

48204.4.

(a) A pupil complies with the residency requirements for school attendance in a school district if he or she is a pupil whose parent or parents were residents of this state and departed California against their will, as defined in subdivision (d), and, if the pupil seeks admission to a school of the school district, shall be admitted by the governing board of the school district regardless of his or her current residency, if that pupil meets both of the following requirements:

(1) The pupil has a parent or guardian who departed California against his or her will, as defined in subdivision (d). The pupil shall provide official documentation evidencing the departure of his or her parent or guardian.

(2) The pupil moved outside of California as a result of his or her parent or guardian departing California against his or her will, as defined in subdivision (d), and the pupil lived in California immediately before moving outside of California. The pupil shall provide information and evidence demonstrating that the pupil was enrolled in a public school in California immediately before moving outside of California.

(b) The parent or guardian of a pupil subject to subdivision (a) may designate an adult to attend school meetings and serve as an emergency contact.

(c) Charges or fees of any kind shall not be required to be paid by a pupil, or by his or her parents or guardian, for admission or attendance in a school of a school district that provides instruction in accord with the requirements of this section.

(d) (1) For purposes of this section, a person has “departed California against his or her will” if any of the following circumstances apply:

(A) The person was in custody of a government agency and was transferred to another state.

(B) The person was subject to a lawful order from a court or government agency that authorized the person’s removal from California.

(C) The person was subject to a lawful order pursuant to subparagraph (B) and was permitted to depart California before being removed from California pursuant to the lawful order.

(D) The person was removed or is permitted to depart voluntarily pursuant to the federal Immigration and Nationality Act (8 U.S.C. Sec. 1229c).

(2) A school district may determine additional circumstances that are consistent with the purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 92, Sec. 54.   (SB 1289)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

48204.5.

(a) The Legislature finds that school districts that are adjacent to the international border, because of their geographic position, face unique circumstances in conducting the verification of a pupil’s residency.

(b) The Legislature declares that international border school districts may need to employ certain efforts to verify residency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 309, Sec. 1.   Effective August 3, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

48204.6.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Local educational agency” means a county office of education, a school district, or a charter school.

(2) “Pupil who is a child of a military family” means a pupil who meets the definition of “children of military families” in Section 49701.

(3) “School of origin” means the school in which the pupil is enrolled at the time that a change in residence occurs.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 48200, the local educational agency serving
 a pupil who is a child of a military family shall do either of the following:

(1) Allow the pupil to continue his or her education in the school of origin, regardless of any change of residence of the military family during that school year, for the duration of the pupil’s status as a child of a military family.

(2) For a pupil whose status changes due to the end of military service of his or her parent
 during a school year, comply with either of the following, as applicable:

(A) If the pupil is enrolled in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 8,
 inclusive, allow the pupil to continue his or her education in the school of origin through the duration of that academic school year.

(B) If the child is enrolled in high school, allow the pupil to continue his or her education in the school of origin through graduation.

(c) To ensure that the pupil who is a child of a military family has the benefit of matriculating with his or her peers in accordance with the established feeder patterns of
 school districts, the following apply:

(1) If the pupil who is a child of a military family is transitioning between school grade levels, the local educational agency shall allow the pupil who is a child of a military family to continue in the school district of origin in the same attendance area.

(2) If the pupil who is a child of a military family is transitioning to a middle school or high school, and the school designated for matriculation is in another school district, the local educational agency shall allow the pupil who is a child of a military family to continue to the school designated for matriculation in that school district.

(3) The new school shall immediately enroll the pupil who is a child of a
 military family even if the child has outstanding fees, fines, textbooks, or other items or moneys due to the school last attended or is unable to produce clothing or records normally required for enrollment, such as previous academic records, medical records, including, but not limited to, records or other proof of immunization history pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 120325) of Part 2 of Division 105 of the Health and Safety Code, proof of residency, other documentation, or school uniforms.

(d) Unless otherwise required by federal law, this section does not require a local educational agency to provide transportation
 services to allow a pupil subject to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b)
 or subdivision (c) to attend a school pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 327, Sec. 1.   (AB 2949)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

48204.7.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Local educational agency” means a county office of education, school district, or charter school.

(2) “Pupil who is a migratory child” means a pupil who meets the definition of “currently migratory child” in Section 54441.

(3) “School of origin” means the school in which the pupil is enrolled at the time that a change in residence occurs.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 48200, the local educational agency serving a pupil who
 is a migratory child shall do either of the following:

(1) Allow the pupil to continue their education in the school of origin, regardless of any change of residence of the migratory child during that school year, for the duration of the pupil’s status as a pupil who is a migratory child.

(2) For a pupil whose status changes as a pupil who is a migratory child during a school year, comply with either of the following, as applicable:

(A) If the pupil is enrolled in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 8, inclusive, allow the pupil to continue their education in the school of origin through the duration of that academic school year.

(B) If the child is
 enrolled in high school, allow the pupil to continue their education in the school of origin through graduation.

(c) To ensure that a pupil who is a migratory child has the benefit of matriculating with their peers in accordance with the established feeder patterns of school districts, the following apply:

(1) If the pupil who is a migratory child is transitioning between school grade levels, the local educational agency shall allow the pupil who is a migratory child to continue in the school district of origin in the same attendance area.

(2) If the pupil who is a migratory child is transitioning to a middle school or high
 school and the school designated for matriculation is in another school district, the local educational agency shall allow the pupil who is a migratory child to continue to the school designated for matriculation in that school district.

(3) The new school shall immediately enroll the pupil who is a migratory child even if the child has outstanding fees, fines, textbooks, or other items or moneys due to the school last attended or is unable to produce clothing or records normally required for enrollment, such as previous academic records, medical records, including, but not limited to, records or other proof of immunization history pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 120325) of Part 2 of Division 105 of the Health and Safety Code, proof of residency, other documentation, or school uniforms.

(d) Unless otherwise required by federal law, this section does not require a local educational agency to provide transportation services to allow a pupil subject to paragraph (1) or (2) of subdivision (b) or subdivision (c) to attend a school pursuant to this section.

(e) This section does not require a local educational agency to provide a pupil who is a migratory child with a program with online instruction as a substitute for physical attendance.

(f) A local educational agency shall inform a pupil who is a migratory child and that pupil’s parent or guardian of the impact of remaining in
 the school of origin on the eligibility of that pupil to receive migrant education services, as described in Article 3 (commencing with Section 54440) of Chapter 4 of Part 29.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 458, Sec. 1.   (AB 1319)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

48205.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 48200, a pupil shall be excused from school when the absence is:

(1) Due to the pupil’s illness, including an absence for the benefit of the pupil’s mental or behavioral health.

(2) Due to quarantine under the direction of a county or city health officer.

(3) For purposes of having medical, dental, optometrical, or chiropractic services rendered.

(4) For purposes of attending the funeral services or grieving the death of either a member of the pupil’s immediate family, or of a person that is determined by the pupil’s parent or guardian to be in
 such close association with the pupil as to be considered the pupil’s immediate family, so long as the absence is not more than five days per incident.

(5) For purposes of jury duty in the manner provided for by law.

(6) Due to the illness or medical appointment during school hours of a child of whom the pupil is the custodial parent, including absences to care for a sick child, for which the school shall not require a note from a doctor.

(7) For justifiable personal reasons, including, but not limited to, an attendance or appearance in court, attendance at a funeral service, observance of a holiday or ceremony of the pupil’s religion, attendance at a religious retreat, attendance at an employment conference, or attendance at an educational conference on the legislative or judicial process offered by a nonprofit
 organization, when the pupil’s absence is requested in writing by the parent or guardian and approved by the principal or a designated representative pursuant to uniform standards established by the governing board of the school district.

(8) For purposes of serving as a member of a precinct board for an election pursuant to Section 12302 of the Elections Code.

(9) For purposes of spending time with a member of the pupil’s immediate family who is an active duty member of the uniformed services, as defined in Section 49701, and has been called to duty for, is on leave from, or has immediately returned from, deployment. Absences granted pursuant to this paragraph shall be granted for a period of time to be determined at the discretion of the superintendent of the school district.

(10) For purposes of attending the
 pupil’s naturalization ceremony to become a United States citizen.

(11) For purposes of participating in a cultural ceremony or event.

(12) (A) For purposes of a middle school or high school pupil engaging in a civic or political event, as provided in subparagraph (B), provided that the pupil notifies the school ahead of the absence.

(B) (i) A middle school or high school pupil who is absent pursuant to subparagraph (A) is required to be excused for only one schoolday-long absence per school year.

(ii) A middle school or high school pupil who is absent pursuant to subparagraph (A) may be permitted additional excused absences in the discretion of a school administrator, as described in subdivision (c) of
 Section 48260.

(13) (A) For any of the purposes described in clauses (i) to (iii), inclusive, if an immediate family member of the pupil, or a person that is determined by the pupil’s parent or guardian to be in such close association with the pupil as to be considered the pupil’s immediate family, has died, so long as the absence is not more than three days per incident.

(i) To access services from a victim services organization or agency.

(ii) To access grief support services.

(iii) To participate in safety planning or to take other actions to increase the safety of the pupil or an immediate family member of the pupil, or a person that is determined by the pupil’s parent or guardian to be in such close association with the pupil
 as to be considered the pupil’s immediate family, including, but not limited to, temporary or permanent relocation.

(B) Any absences beyond three days for the reasons described in subparagraph (A) shall be subject to the discretion of the school administrator, or their designee, pursuant to Section 48260.

(14) Due to the pupil’s participation in military entrance processing.

(15) Authorized at the discretion of a school administrator, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 48260.

(b) A pupil absent from school pursuant to this section shall be allowed to complete all assignments and tests missed during the absence that can be reasonably provided and, upon satisfactory completion within a reasonable period of time, shall be given full credit for
 those assignments and tests. The teacher of the class from which a pupil is absent shall determine which tests and assignments shall be reasonably equivalent to, but not necessarily identical to, the tests and assignments that the pupil missed during the absence.

(c) For purposes of this section, attendance at religious retreats shall not exceed one schoolday per semester.

(d) Absences pursuant to this section are deemed to be absences in computing average daily attendance and shall not generate state apportionment payments.

(e) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) A “civic or political event” includes, but is not limited to, voting, poll working, strikes, public commenting, candidate speeches, political or civic forums,
 and town halls.

(2) “Cultural” means relating to the practices, habits, beliefs, and traditions of a certain group of people.

(3) “Immediate family” means the parent or guardian, brother or sister, grandparent, or any other relative living in the household of the pupil.

(4) “Victim services organization or agency” has the same meaning as defined in subdivision (j) of Section 12945.8 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 967, Sec. 2.3.   (AB 2499)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

48206.3.

(a) A pupil with a temporary disability that makes attendance in the regular day classes or alternative education program in which the pupil is enrolled impossible or inadvisable shall receive either individual instruction at home provided by the school district in which the pupil is deemed to reside, or individual instruction in a hospital or other residential health facility, excluding state hospitals, provided by the school district in which the hospital or other residential health facility is located.

(b) For purposes of this section and Sections
 48207,
 48207.3, 48207.5, and 48208, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Individual instruction” means instruction provided to an individual pupil in the pupil’s home, in a hospital or other residential health facility, excluding state hospitals, or under other circumstances prescribed by regulations adopted for that purpose by the state board.

(2) “Temporary disability” means a physical, mental, or emotional disability incurred while a pupil is enrolled in regular day classes or an alternative education program, and after which the pupil can reasonably be expected to return to regular day classes or the alternative education program. A temporary disability shall not include a disability for which a pupil is identified as an individual with
 exceptional needs pursuant to Section 56026.

(c) (1) For purposes of computing average daily attendance pursuant to Section 42238.05, each clock hour of teaching time devoted to individual instruction shall count as one day of attendance.

(2) No pupil shall be credited with more than five days of attendance per calendar week, or more than the total number of calendar days that regular classes are maintained by the school district in any fiscal year.

(d) Notice of the availability of individual instruction shall be given pursuant to Section 48980, and shall include information regarding a pupil’s eligibility for, and the duration of, individual instruction.

(e) Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit any rights accruing to a pupil with a temporary disability who is also identified as an individual with exceptional needs, as defined in Section 56026.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 167, Sec. 1.   (AB 2109)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

48207.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 48200, a pupil with a temporary disability, who is in a hospital or other residential health facility, excluding a state hospital, located outside of the school district in which the pupil’s parent or guardian resides, shall be deemed to have complied with the residency requirements for school attendance in the school district in which the hospital is located.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, a school district or charter school may continue to enroll a pupil with a temporary disability who is receiving individual instruction in a hospital or other residential health facility in order to facilitate the timely reentry of
 the pupil in his or her prior school after the hospitalization has ended, or in order to provide a partial week of instruction to a pupil who is receiving individual instruction in a hospital or other residential health facility, for fewer than five days of instruction per week, or the equivalent, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 48206.3.

(c) (1) A pupil with a temporary disability who remains enrolled in a school district of residence or a charter school pursuant to subdivision (b) while also receiving individual instruction in a hospital or other residential health facility may only be counted by the school district of residence or charter school for purposes of computing average daily attendance pursuant to Section 42238.05 for days on which the pupil is in attendance in that school district or charter
 school.

(2) A pupil with a temporary disability who remains enrolled in a school district of residence or a charter school pursuant to subdivision (b) while also receiving individual instruction in a hospital or other residential health facility may only be counted by the school district in which the hospital or other residential health facility is located for purposes of computing average daily attendance pursuant to Section 42238.05 for days on which the pupil is receiving individual instruction in a hospital or other residential health facility.

(d) The total attendance counted for purposes of computing average daily attendance pursuant to Section 42238.05 for a pupil with a temporary disability, including days of attendance in a hospital or other residential health
 facility, shall not exceed five days per week, or the equivalent, as described in subdivision (c) of Section 48206.3.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 167, Sec. 3.   (AB 2109)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

48207.3.

(a) A pupil receiving individual instruction who is well enough to return to a school shall be allowed to return to the school, including a charter school, that he or she attended immediately before receiving individual instruction, if the pupil returns during the school year in which the individual instruction was initiated.

(b) A pupil who attends a school operated by a school district or a charter school, who is subsequently enrolled in individual instruction in a hospital or other residential health facility for a partial week, shall be entitled to attend school in his or her school district of residence, or receive individual instruction provided by the
 school district of residence in the pupil’s home, on days in which he or she is not receiving individual instruction in a hospital or other residential health facility, if he or she is well enough to do so.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 167, Sec. 4.   (AB 2109)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

48207.5.

Individual instruction in a pupil’s home pursuant to Section 48206.3 shall commence no later than five working days after a school district has determined that the pupil shall receive this instruction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 167, Sec. 5.   (AB 2109)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

48208.

(a) It shall be the primary responsibility of the parent or guardian of a pupil with a temporary disability to notify the school district in which the pupil is deemed to reside pursuant to Section 48207 of the pupil’s presence in a qualifying hospital.

(b) Upon receipt of notification pursuant to subdivision (a), a school district shall do all of the following:

(1) Within five working days of receipt of the notification, determine whether the pupil will be able to receive individual instruction, and, if the determination is positive, when the individual instruction may commence. Individual
 instruction shall commence no later than five working days after a positive determination has been rendered.

(2) Provide the pupil with individual instruction pursuant to Section 48206.3. The school district may enter into an agreement with the school district in which the pupil previously attended regular day classes or an alternative education program to have the school district the pupil previously attended provide the pupil with individual instruction pursuant to Section 48206.3.

(3) Within five working days of the commencement of individual instruction, provide the school district in which the pupil previously attended regular day classes or an alternative education program with written notice that the pupil shall not be counted by that school district for purposes of
 computing average daily attendance pursuant to Section 42238.05, effective the date on which individual instruction commenced, except as provided in Section 48207.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 167, Sec. 6.   (AB 2109)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Persons Excluded [48210. - 48216.]

48210.

Children under six years of age are excluded from the public schools, except as provided in this code.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48213.

If a pupil is excluded from attendance pursuant to Section 120230 of the Health and Safety Code or Section 49451 of this code, or if a principal or his or her designee determines that the continued presence of the child would constitute a clear and present danger to the life, safety, or health of a pupil or school personnel, the governing board is not required to send prior notice of the exclusion to the parent or guardian of the pupil. The governing board shall send a notice of the exclusion as soon as is reasonably possible after the exclusion.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2005, Ch. 677, Sec. 31.   Effective October 7, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

48216.

(a) The county office of education or the governing board of the school district of attendance shall exclude any pupil who has not been immunized properly pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 120325) of Part 2 of Division 105 of the Health and Safety Code. 

(b) The governing board of the district shall notify the parent or guardian of the pupil that they have two weeks to supply evidence either that the pupil has been properly immunized, or that the pupil is exempted from the immunization requirement pursuant to Section 120365 or 120370 of the Health and Safety Code.

(c) The governing board of the district, in the notice, shall refer the parent or guardian of the pupil to the pupil’s usual source of medical care to obtain the immunization, or if no usual source exists, either refer the parent or guardian to the county health department, or notify the parent or guardian that the immunizations will be administered at a school of the district.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 46010.5 by Stats. 1997, Ch. 855, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 1998.   Operative July 1, 1998, by Sec. 12 of Ch. 855.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Pupils Exempt [48220. - 48232.]

48220.

The classes of children described in this article, shall be exempted by the proper school authorities from the requirements of attendance upon a public full-time day school.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48222.

Children who are being instructed in a private full-time day school by persons capable of teaching shall be exempted. Such school shall, except under the circumstances described in Section 30, be taught in the English language and shall offer instruction in the several branches of study required to be taught in the public schools of the state. The attendance of the pupils shall be kept by private school authorities in a register, and the record of attendance shall indicate clearly every absence of the pupil from school for a half day or more during each day that school is maintained during the year.

Exemptions under this section shall be valid only after verification by the attendance supervisor of the district, or other person designated by the board of education, that the private school has complied with the provisions of Section 33190 requiring the annual filing by the owner or other head of a private school of an affidavit or statement of prescribed information with the Superintendent of Public Instruction. The verification required by this section shall not be construed as an evaluation, recognition, approval, or endorsement of any private school or course.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48223.

Children who are mentally gifted and who are being instructed in a private full-time day school by persons capable of teaching, where all or part of the courses of instruction required to be taught in the public schools of this state is taught in a world language with not less than 50 percent of the total daily instructional time taught in the English language, shall be exempted. The attendance of the pupils shall be kept pursuant to Section 48222.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 865, Sec. 14.   (AB 2319)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

48224.

Children not attending a private, full-time, day school and who are being instructed in study and recitation for at least three hours a day for 175 days each calendar year by a private tutor or other person in the several branches of study required to be taught in the public schools of this state and in the English language shall be exempted. The tutor or other person shall hold a valid state credential for the grade taught. The instruction shall be offered between the hours of 8 o'clock a.m. and 4 o'clock p.m.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48225.

The governing board of any school district which has children holding work permits to work temporarily in the entertainment or allied industries who are exempted from attending public full-time day school under the provisions of this article, or a county superintendent of schools, may contract with any person, firm or corporation responsible for the education of any children, so employed or acting on behalf thereof, to provide eligibility lists and placement services for qualified teaching and other necessary personnel for the tutoring of such children while so employed. Such personnel shall not for these purposes be deemed public employees. The contract shall require the payment of all costs of the school district, or the county superintendent of schools in providing the lists or services.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48225.5.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding Section 48200, a pupil who holds a work permit to work for a period of not more than five consecutive days in the entertainment or allied industries shall be excused from school during the period that the pupil is working in the entertainment or allied industry for a maximum of up to five absences per school year.

(2) Notwithstanding Section 48200, a pupil shall be excused from school in order to participate with a not-for-profit performing arts organization in a performance for a public school pupil audience for a maximum of up to five days per school year provided the pupil’s parent or guardian provides a written note to the school authorities explaining the reason for the pupil’s absence.

(b) A pupil absent from school under this section shall be permitted to complete all assignments and tests missed during the absence that can be reasonably provided and, upon satisfactory completion, shall be given full credit therefor. The teacher of any class from which a pupil is absent shall determine, pursuant to the regulations of the governing board of the school district, or the county board of education, what assignments the pupil shall make up and in what period of time the pupil shall complete those assignments. The tests and assignments shall be reasonably equivalent to, but not necessarily identical to, the tests and assignments that the pupil missed during the absence.

(c) A pupil absent pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall receive instruction during the period of the absence from a studio teacher certified by the Labor Commissioner holding credentials as defined in Section 11755 of Title 8 of the California Code of Regulations. The instruction shall be offered between 7 a.m. and 4 p.m. for pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 6, inclusive, and between 7 a.m. and 7 p.m. for pupils in grades 7 to 12, inclusive. The school district or county superintendent of schools shall accept the work done by the pupil and the grades given to the pupil on that work and shall provide the pupil with credit for the instruction the pupil received from that teacher.

(d) At the request of a pupil excused from school pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), the pupil may be permitted to enroll in a work experience program of the school district and shall receive appropriate academic credit for that work experience.

(e) This section shall apply to all pupils, whether a pupil is enrolled in regular classes or special education classes, a regional occupational program or center, or a program of independent study, or any other program of the school district or county superintendent of schools.

(History: Added by Stats. 1997, Ch. 879, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

48230.

Children who hold permits to work shall be exempted, but such children shall be subject to compulsory attendance upon part-time classes.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

48231.

Notwithstanding Section 48201, pupils between 12 and 18 years of age who enter an attendance area from another state within 10 schooldays before the end of the school term during which such entrance occurs are exempt for the remainder of the school term.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

48232.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a child who will be 15 years old at the time a leave of absence is to begin may take a leave of absence from school for a period of up to one semester, if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The school district governing board adopts a written policy to allow pupil leaves of absence consistent with this section.

(b) The purpose of the leave is supervised travel, study, training, or work not available to the pupil under another education option.

(c) A written agreement is entered into that is signed by the child’s parent or guardian, the principal or administrative officer of the school which the child would otherwise attend, a classroom teacher familiar with the child’s academic progress selected by the child, and the district supervisor of child welfare and attendance, and that provides for all of the following:

(1) The purpose of the leave.

(2) The length of time the child will be on leave.

(3) A meeting between, or contact with, the child and a school official designated in the agreement at least once a month while the child is on leave.

(4) A statement incorporating the provisions contained in subdivision (b).

(d) The child shall be entitled to return to school at any time. No child who takes a leave of absence shall be penalized from completing his or her academic requirements within a time period equal to that of classmates who did not take a leave of absence, plus a period of time equal to the leave of absence. However, when a child reenrolls at any time other than the beginning of a semester, the school shall not be required to give makeup sessions during that semester for the classes that the child has missed.

(e) A leave of absence may be extended for an additional semester upon approval by all parties to the written agreement and the local school attendance review board.

(f) No leave of absence may be taken that would continue past the end of the school year in which the leave is taken.

(g) If the pupil does not contact the designated school official as stipulated in the written agreement, the leave of absence shall be nullified.

Any party to the written agreement may nullify the agreement for cause at any time.

(h) No more than 1 percent of the pupils enrolled and in attendance at each school shall be permitted to take a leave of absence during each academic year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 922, Sec. 103.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Supervisors of Attendance [48240. - 48246.]

48240.
